Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-114.4 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon the effective date of this act, every hospital and
health care facility in this state shall be required to post
HB3287 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

CORRECTED
dome stic violence and human trafficking signage in inconspicuous
areas throughout the hospital and health care facility and in areas
deemed private and restricted for the use of patients and healthcare
providers only. The signage shall contain the following
information:
"If you are a victim of domestic abuse or if you are being
forced or have been forced to perform any sexual act or are a victim
of human trafficking, please notify the staff of this facility
immediately."
B. Hospitals and health care facilities shall develop protocols
and procedures to be used for reporting alleged or confirmed cases
of domestic abuse and human trafficking for commercial sex to
appropriate law enforcement agencies if requested to do so by the
victim prior to discharge of the victim from the hospital or release
from a health care facility. The protocols shall also include
procedures for assisting law enforcement and the victim of domestic
abuse or human trafficking in securing said discharge or release
without interference by or notification to the alleged perpetrator
of domestic abuse or human trafficking.
C. The State Department of Health shall make the signage
available for print on the public website of the Department.
Hospitals and health care facilities may request that the signage be
mailed to the hospital or health care facility for the cost of
printing and first class postage.
HB3287 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

CORRECTED
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.





















HB3287 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.